apertium-pl-uk.pl.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaÁáÄäBbCcČčDdĎďEeÉéFfGgHhIiÍíJjKkLlĽľĹĺMmNnŇňOoÓóÔôPpQqRrŔŕSsŠšTtŤťUuÚúVvWwXxYyÝýZzŽžĄąĆćĘęŁłŃńÓóŚśQqŻżŹźÁČĎÉĚÍŇŘŠŤÚŮÝŽáčďéěíňřšťúůýžĕ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <!-- części mowy -->
    <sdef n="n"       c="rzeczownik"/>   
    <sdef n="num"     c="liczebnik"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="przymiotnik"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="przysłówek"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"   c="czasownik"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="czasownik być"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="czasownik mieć"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"    c="czasownik posiłkowy"/>

    <sdef n="pr"      c="przyimek"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="zaimek"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="określnik"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="wykrzyknik"/>

    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="spójnik przysłówkowy"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="spójnik współrzędny"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="spójnik podrzędny"/>

    <!-- rodzaje -->
    <sdef n="m"       c="męski (nazwa własna)"/>
    <sdef n="mp"      c="męski"/>
    <sdef n="ma"      c="męski żywotny"/>
    <sdef n="mi"      c="męski nieżywotny"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="żeński"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="nijaki"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="męski albo/i żeński"/>
    <sdef n="nm"      c="niemęski (np 'Polaki' a nie 'Polacy')"/>

    <sdef n="np"      c="nazwa własna"/>
    <sdef n="hyd"     c="hydronim"/>
    <sdef n="top"     c="miejsce"/>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="imię"/>
    <sdef n="cog"     c="nazwisko"/>
    <sdef n="al"      c="altres"/>

    <!-- osoby -->
    <sdef n="p1"      c="pierwsza osoba"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="druga osoba"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="trzecia osoba"/>
    <sdef n="impers"  c=""/>

    <!-- przypadki -->
    <sdef n="nom"     c="mianownik"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="dopełniacz"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="celownik"/>
    <sdef n="acc"     c="biernik"/>
    <sdef n="ins"     c="narzędnik"/>
    <sdef n="loc"     c="miejscownik"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="wołacz"/>

    <!-- liczby -->
    <sdef n="sg"      c="liczba pojedyncza"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="liczba mnoga"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="pojedyncza albo/i mnoga"/>
    <sdef n="cnt"     c="policzalne"/>
    <sdef n="unc"     c="niepoliczalne"/>
    
    <!-- czasy -->   
    <sdef n="past"    c="czas przeszły"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="czas teraźniejszy"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="czas teraźniejszy - nieużywany"/>
    <sdef n="fut"     c="czas przyszły"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="pprs"    c=""/>

    <!-- tryby -->
    <sdef n="imp"     c="tryb rozkazujący"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="bezokolicznik"/>
    <sdef n="cni"     c="tryb przypuszczający"/>

    <!-- inne -->
    <sdef n="ger"     c="rzeczownik odczasownikowy"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="rodzajnik określony (wskazujący)"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="dzierżawczy"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="pytający"/>
    <sdef n="ind"     c="rodzajnik nieokreślony"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="zwrotny"/>
    <sdef n="imperf"  c="czasownik niedokonany"/>
    <sdef n="perf"    c="czasownik dokonany"/>   
    <sdef n="sint"    c="przymiotnik albo przysłówek mający stopień wyższy/najwyższy"/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c="stopień wyższy"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="stopień najwyższy"/>
    <sdef n="emph"    c="wymowny"/>
    <sdef n="acr"     c="akronim"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="indecl"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="cpd"/>
    <sdef n="po"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="ppr"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"/>
    <sdef n="dim"/>
    <sdef n="uns"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Punctuation -->
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="np__abbr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="abbr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>„</l>
          <r>„<s n="lquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>“</l>
          <r>“<s n="rquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <i>1</i>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[2-4]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[5-9]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9][0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Interjunctions -->
    <pardef n="cześć__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
	       <l></l>
	       <r><s n="ij"/></r>
 	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ca"><i>ca</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ok"><i>ok</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="inż"><i>inż</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="tel"><i>tel</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="br"><i>br</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="s.a."><i>s.a.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="kpt"><i>kpt</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="mjr"><i>mjr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="i.in."><i>i<b/>in.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="hl"><i>hl</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ha"><i>ha</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="fr"><i>fr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="dag"><i>dag</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="min"><i>min</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="max"><i>max</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="mgr"><i>mgr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="str"><i>str</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="tys"><i>tys</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="mg"><i>mg</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="kcal"><i>kcal</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="www"><i>www</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="kb"><i>kb</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="mies"><i>mies</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="tab"><i>tab</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="p."><i>p.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="r."><i>r.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Kč"><i>Kč</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="gr"><i>gr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="rep"><i>rep</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="wg"><i>wg</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="dyr"><i>dyr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="dkg"><i>dkg</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="pw"><i>pw</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="wyd"><i>wyd</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="tv"><i>tv</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="szt"><i>szt</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ww."><i>ww.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="jpg"><i>jpg</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="bmp"><i>bmp</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ascii"><i>ascii</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="utf"><i>utf</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="api"><i>api</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="utc"><i>utc</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="cześć"><i>cześć</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="aha"><i>aha</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobranoc"><i>dobranoc</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dzień dobry"><i>dzień<b/>dobry</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="mniam"><i>mniam</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="halo"><i>halo</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="do widzenia"><i>do<b/>widzenia</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="do jutra"><i>do<b/>jutra</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="do zobaczenia"><i>do<b/>zobaczenia</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="pa"><i>pa</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobry wieczór"><i>dobry<b/>wieczór</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nie ma za co"><i>nie<b/>ma<b/>za<b/>co</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nie ma sprawy"><i>nie<b/>ma<b/>sprawy</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dziękuję bardzo"><i>dziękuję<b/>bardzo</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="miłego dnia"><i>miłego<b/>dnia</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="proszę"><i>proszę</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="na zdrowie"><i>na<b/>zdrowie</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="smacznego"><i>smacznego</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="przepraszam"><i>przepraszam</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="przykro mi"><i>przykro<b/>mi</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="z przyjemnością"><i>z<b/>przyjemnością</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
